Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1804
Validity of unsworn declaration.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, if a law of this state requires or permits use of a sworn declaration, an unsworn declaration meeting the requirements of the Uniform Unsworn Foreign Declarations Act has the same effect as a sworn declaration.

(b) The act does not apply to:

(1) a deposition;

(2) an oath of office;

(3) an oath required to be given before a specified official other than a notary public;

(4) a declaration to be recorded pursuant to a filing of a conveyance of or a lien on any interest in real estate;

(5) a power of attorney; or

(6) an oath required by section 30-2329.

Laws 2017, LB57, § 6.